tests/wiki.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах автан":
    автан<n><nom> :  автан 
    автан<n><gen> :  автанӑн 
    автан<n><dat> :  автана 
    автан<n><loc> :  автанта
    автан<n><abl> :  автантан
    автан<n><ins> :  автанпа 
    автан<n><abe> :  автансӑр 
    автан<n><ben> :  автаншӑн
    автан<n><px1sg><nom> :  автанӑм 
    автан<n><px1sg><gen> :  автанӑмӑн 
    автан<n><px1sg><dat> :  автанӑма 
    автан<n><px1sg><loc> :  автанӑмра 
    автан<n><px1sg><abl> :  автанӑмран 
    автан<n><px1sg><ins> :  автанӑмпа 
    автан<n><px1sg><abe> :  автанӑмсӑр 
    автан<n><px1sg><ben> :  автанӑмшӑн
    автан<n><px2sg><nom> :  автану 
    автан<n><px2sg><gen> :  автанун 
    автан<n><px2sg><dat> :  автанна
    автан<n><px2sg><loc> :  автанунта 
    автан<n><px2sg><abl> :  автанунтан 
    автан<n><px2sg><ins> :  автанупа 
    автан<n><px2sg><abe> :  автанусӑр 
    автан<n><px2sg><ben> :  автанушӑн
    автан<n><px3sp><nom> :  автанӗ 
    автан<n><px3sp><gen> :  автанӗн 
    автан<n><px3sp><dat> :  автанне 
    автан<n><px3sp><loc> :  автанӗнче 
    автан<n><px3sp><abl> :  автанӗнчен 
    автан<n><px3sp><ins> :  автанӗпе 
    автан<n><px3sp><abe> :  автанӗсӗр 
    автан<n><px3sp><ben> :  автанӗшӗн
    автан<n><px1pl><nom> :  автанӑмӑр 
    автан<n><px1pl><gen> :  автанӑмӑрӑн 
    автан<n><px1pl><dat> :  автанӑмӑра 
    автан<n><px1pl><loc> :  автанӑмӑрта 
    автан<n><px1pl><abl> :  автанӑмӑртан 
    автан<n><px1pl><ins> :  автанӑмӑрпа 
    автан<n><px1pl><abe> :  автанӑмӑрсӑр 
    автан<n><px1pl><ben> :  автанӑмӑршӑн
    автан<n><px2pl><nom> :  автанӑр 
    автан<n><px2pl><gen> :  автанӑрӑн 
    автан<n><px2pl><dat> :  автанӑра 
    автан<n><px2pl><loc> :  автанӑрта 
    автан<n><px2pl><abl> :  автанӑртан 
    автан<n><px2pl><ins> :  автанӑрпа 
    автан<n><px2pl><abe> :  автанӑрсӑр 
    автан<n><px2pl><ben> :  автанӑршӑн
    автан<n><pl><nom> :  автансем 
    автан<n><pl><gen> :  автансен 
    автан<n><pl><dat> :  автансене 
    автан<n><pl><loc> :  автансенче 
    автан<n><pl><abl> :  автансенчен 
    автан<n><pl><ins> :  автансемпе 
    автан<n><pl><abe> :  автансемсӗр 
    автан<n><pl><ben> :  автансемшӗн
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  автанӑмсем 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  автанӑмсен 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  автанӑмсене 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  автанӑмсенче 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  автанӑмсенчен 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  автанӑмсемпе 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  автанӑмсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  автанӑмсемшӗн
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  автанусем 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  автанусен 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  автанусене 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  автанусенче 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  автанусенчен 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  автанусемпе 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  автанусемсӗр 
    автан<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  автанусемшӗн
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  автанӗсем 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  автанӗсен 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  автанӗсене 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  автанӗсенче 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  автанӗсенчен 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  автанӗсемпе 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  автанӗсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  автанӗсемшӗн
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  автанӑмӑрсем 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  автанӑмӑрсен 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  автанӑмӑрсене 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  автанӑмӑрсенче 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  автанӑмӑрсенчен 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  автанӑмӑрсемпе 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  автанӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  автанӑмӑрсемшӗн
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  автанӑрсем 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  автанӑрсен 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  автанӑрсене 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  автанӑрсенче 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  автанӑрсенчен 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  автанӑрсемпе 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  автанӑрсемсӗр 
    автан<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  автанӑрсемшӗн

  "Сӑмах автобус":
    автобус<n><nom> :  автобус 
    автобус<n><gen> :  автобусӑн 
    автобус<n><dat> :  автобуса 
    автобус<n><loc> :  автобусра 
    автобус<n><abl> :  автобусран 
    автобус<n><ins> :  автобуспа 
    автобус<n><abe> :  автобуссӑр 
    автобус<n><ben> :  автобусшӑн
    автобус<n><px1sg><nom> :  автобусӑм 
    автобус<n><px1sg><gen> :  автобусӑмӑн 
    автобус<n><px1sg><dat> :  автобусӑма 
    автобус<n><px1sg><loc> :  автобусӑмра 
    автобус<n><px1sg><abl> :  автобусӑмран 
    автобус<n><px1sg><ins> :  автобусӑмпа 
    автобус<n><px1sg><abe> :  автобусӑмсӑр 
    автобус<n><px1sg><ben> :  автобусӑмшӑн
    автобус<n><px2sg><nom> :  автобусу 
    автобус<n><px2sg><gen> :  автобусун 
    автобус<n><px2sg><dat> :  автобусна
    автобус<n><px2sg><loc> :  автобусунта 
    автобус<n><px2sg><abl> :  автобусунтан 
    автобус<n><px2sg><ins> :  автобусупа 
    автобус<n><px2sg><abe> :  автобусусӑр 
    автобус<n><px2sg><ben> :  автобусушӑн
    автобус<n><px3sp><nom> :  автобусӗ 
    автобус<n><px3sp><gen> :  автобусӗн 
    автобус<n><px3sp><dat> :  автобусне 
    автобус<n><px3sp><loc> :  автобусӗнче 
    автобус<n><px3sp><abl> :  автобусӗнчен 
    автобус<n><px3sp><ins> :  автобусӗпе 
    автобус<n><px3sp><abe> :  автобусӗсӗр 
    автобус<n><px3sp><ben> :  автобусӗшӗн
    автобус<n><px1pl><nom> :  автобусӑмӑр 
    автобус<n><px1pl><gen> :  автобусӑмӑрӑн 
    автобус<n><px1pl><dat> :  автобусӑмӑра 
    автобус<n><px1pl><loc> :  автобусӑмӑрта 
    автобус<n><px1pl><abl> :  автобусӑмӑртан 
    автобус<n><px1pl><ins> :  автобусӑмӑрпа 
    автобус<n><px1pl><abe> :  автобусӑмӑрсӑр 
    автобус<n><px1pl><ben> :  автобусӑмӑршӑн
    автобус<n><px2pl><nom> :  автобусӑр 
    автобус<n><px2pl><gen> :  автобусӑрӑн 
    автобус<n><px2pl><dat> :  автобусӑра 
    автобус<n><px2pl><loc> :  автобусӑрта 
    автобус<n><px2pl><abl> :  автобусӑртан 
    автобус<n><px2pl><ins> :  автобусӑрпа 
    автобус<n><px2pl><abe> :  автобусӑрсӑр 
    автобус<n><px2pl><ben> :  автобусӑршӑн
    автобус<n><pl><nom> :  автобуссем 
    автобус<n><pl><gen> :  автобуссен 
    автобус<n><pl><dat> :  автобуссене 
    автобус<n><pl><loc> :  автобуссенче 
    автобус<n><pl><abl> :  автобуссенчен 
    автобус<n><pl><ins> :  автобуссемпе 
    автобус<n><pl><abe> :  автобуссемсӗр 
    автобус<n><pl><ben> :  автобуссемшӗн
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  автобусӑмсем 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  автобусӑмсен 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  автобусӑмсене 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  автобусӑмсенче 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  автобусӑмсенчен 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  автобусӑмсемпе 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  автобусӑмсемсӗр 
    автобус<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  автобусӑмсемшӗн
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  автобусусем 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  автобусусен 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  автобусусене 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  автобусусенче 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  автобусусенчен 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  автобусусемпе 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  автобусусемсӗр 
    автобус<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  автобусусемшӗн
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  автобусӗсем 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  автобусӗсен 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  автобусӗсене 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  автобусӗсенче 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  автобусӗсенчен 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  автобусӗсемпе 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  автобусӗсемсӗр 
    автобус<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  автобусӗсемшӗн
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  автобусӑмӑрсем 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  автобусӑмӑрсен 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  автобусӑмӑрсене 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  автобусӑмӑрсенче 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  автобусӑмӑрсенчен 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  автобусӑмӑрсемпе 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  автобусӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    автобус<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  автобусӑмӑрсемшӗн
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  автобусӑрсем 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  автобусӑрсен 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  автобусӑрсене 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  автобусӑрсенче 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  автобусӑрсенчен 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  автобусӑрсемпе 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  автобусӑрсемсӗр 
    автобус<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  автобусӑрсемшӗн
